Utah statutes.
53B-3-101.   Purpose of chapter.

(1)  It is the purpose of this chapter to confirm and clarify the power vested in the board to pass rules and regulations governing parking and traffic on campuses and related facilities and to enforce the rules and regulations by all appropriate methods.

(2)  The board may delegate this authority and other authority granted under this chapter to the president of each institution so long as the rules and regulations are approved by the institution's board of trustees.

